Hawaii statutes.
[§128E-3] Powers; rulemaking; appointment
of hearing officers. (a) The commission may adopt rules in accordance
with chapter 91 to implement this chapter. The rules shall include, but not be
limited to, requirements for reporting releases. Any person heard at a public
hearing on the adoption of any rule shall be given written notice of the action
taken by the commission with respect to the rule.

(b) In addition to other specific powers
provided in this chapter, the commission may appoint, without regard to chapter
76, hearing officers to conduct public participation activities, including
public hearings and public informational meetings. [L 1993, c 300, pt of §1; am
L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next